Montana, session 2025, HB443.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Power to regulate or license transient retail merchants. The board of county
commissioners of any county or the governing body of an alternative form of government established pursuant
to Title 7, chapter 3, has jurisdiction and power to regulate and license transient retail merchants, subject to any
restrictions or limitations as are prescribed by law.
Section 2. Repealer. The following sections of the Montana Code Annotated are repealed:
7-21-2404. License required to do business as transient retail merchant -- fee.
7-21-2405. Nontransferability of license.
7-21-2406. Application for transient retail merchant license.
7-21-2407. Bond or security in lieu of license fee.
7-21-2408. Right of aggrieved purchaser.
7-21-2409. Processing of application -- issuance of license.
7-21-2410. License to be displayed in place of business.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 443
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 443
7-21-2411. Effect of failure to comply with licensing requirements.
Section 3. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title
7, chapter 21, part 24, and the provisions of Title 7, chapter 21, part 24, apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 443
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 443, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 443
INTRODUCED BY B. MITCHELL
AN ACT REVISING LAWS RELATED TO COUNTY REGULATION OF TRANSIENT RETAIL MERCHANTS;
PROVIDING AUTHORITY FOR COUNTY REGULATION OF TRANSIENT RETAIL MERCHANTS; REPEALING
LAWS RELATED TO COUNTY LICENSING OF TRANSIENT RETAIL MERCHANTS; AND REPEALING
SECTIONS 7-21-2401, 7-21-2402, 7-21-2403, 7-21-2404, 7-21-2405, 7-21-2406, 7-21-2407, 7-21-2408, 7-21-
2409, 7-21-2410, AND 7-21-2411, MCA.”